Utah statutes.
48-3a-404.   Sharing of and right to distributions before dissolution.

(1)  Any distributions made by a limited liability company before its dissolution and winding up must be in equal shares among members and persons dissociated as members, except to the extent necessary to comply with a transfer effective under Section 48-3a-502 or charging order in effect under Section 48-3a-503.

(2)  A person has a right to a distribution before the dissolution and winding up of a limited liability company only if the limited liability company decides to make an interim distribution.  A person's dissociation does not entitle the person to a distribution.

(3)  A person does not have a right to demand or receive a distribution from a limited liability company in any form other than money.  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection 48-3a-711(4), a limited liability company may distribute an asset in kind only if each part of the asset is fungible with each other part and each person receives a percentage of the asset equal in value to the person's share of distributions.

(4)  If a member or transferee becomes entitled to receive a distribution, the member or transferee has the status of, and is entitled to all remedies available to, a creditor of the limited liability company with respect to the distribution.  However, the limited liability company's obligation to make a distribution is subject to offset for any amount owed to the limited liability company by the member or a person dissociated as a member on whose account the distribution is made.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

